Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4777.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin FILLMORE COUNTY DISPARITY REDUCTION AID PAYMENTS.new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 273.1398, the 2027 disparity reduction aid payments for jurisdictions located in Fillmore County must include the 2024 and 2025 disparity reduction aid amounts that were not paid to the jurisdictions in those years. The 2024 and 2025 amounts are in addition to any aid determined for 2027, except that these amounts cannot reduce any jurisdiction's levy in 2027 to less than $0. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of revenue must include the 2024 and 2025 disparity reduction aid payments along with the certification for disparity reduction aid paid in 2027, pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 273.1398, subdivision 6. The commissioner of revenue must include the additional amounts from 2024 and 2025 in the payments for aid payable in 2027 to each affected local government, other than school districts. The commissioner of education must include the additional amounts from 2024 and 2025 in the payment to school districts for aid payable in 2027. No later than June 30, 2027, the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of education must deposit to the general fund any unspent funds appropriated under this section. new text end new text begin (c) The appropriations to the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of education for disparity reduction aid payable in 2025 are canceled and must be returned to the general fund. new text end new text begin (d) $530,358 in fiscal year 2028 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue for payments under this section to counties, cities, towns, and special taxing districts. $482,868 in fiscal year 2028 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of education for payments under this section to school districts, intermediate school districts, or any group of school districts levying as a single taxing entity. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end